Connecticut, session 2026, HB05562.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 19a-697 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) A managed residential community shall post in a prominent place
in the managed residential community the resident's bill of rights,
including those rights set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The
posting of the resident's bill of rights shall include contact information
for (1) the Department of Public Health and the Office of the State Long-
Term Care Ombudsman, including the names, addresses and telephone
numbers of persons within such agencies who handle questions,
comments or complaints concerning managed residential community,
and (2) the Department of Social Services to report the suspected abuse,
neglect, exploitation or abandonment of an elderly person, or that an
elderly person may be in need of protective services.
Sec. 2. Subsection (d) of section 17b-105a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
(d) Not later than December 31, 2024, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall enter into a contract with an outside vendor to update the
system utilized by the Department of Social Services to administer the
supplemental nutrition assistance program for the purpose of enabling
the department to stagger the distribution of program benefits so that
benefits are distributed, in accordance with federal law, to cohorts of
program beneficiaries designated by the commissioner at multiple
intervals during each month. Not later than March 1, 2026, the
commissioner shall commence staggering the distribution of such
benefits to such cohorts of beneficiaries each month, in accordance with
federal law. Not later than April 1, 2026, [and annually thereafter,] the
commissioner shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services regarding the
staggering of distribution benefits pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 17a-247b of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(c) The department shall make information in the registry available
only to: (1) Authorized agencies, for the purpose of protective service
determinations; (2) employers who employ employees to provide
services to an individual who receives services or funding from the
department or the Medicaid waiver program for autism spectrum
disorder administered by the Department of Social Services, as
described in section 17a-215c; (3) the Departments of Children and
Families, Mental Health and Addiction Services, Social Services and
Administrative Services and the Office of Labor Relations, for the
purpose of determining whether an applicant for employment with the
Departments of Children and Families, Developmental Services, Mental
Health and Addiction Services and Social Services appears on the
registry; (4) the Office of the Probate Court Administrator, for the
Public Act No. 26-72 2 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
purpose of determining whether a person proposed for appointment as
a guardian pursuant to part V of chapter 802h appears on the registry;
or (5) charitable organizations that recruit volunteers to support
programs for persons with intellectual disability or autism spectrum
disorder, upon application to and approval by the commissioner, for
purposes of conducting background checks on such volunteers.
Sec. 4. Section 46a-175 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established a Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender and
Queer Justice and Opportunity Network to make recommendations to
the state legislative, executive and judicial branches of government
concerning the delivery of access and opportunity services to lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender and queer persons in the state.
(b) The network shall work to build a more just, safer and healthier
environment for gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender and queer persons
by (1) conducting a needs analysis, within available appropriations, (2)
collecting additional data on the access and opportunity needs of such
persons as necessary, (3) informing state policy through reports
submitted at least biennially, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary, public health,
human services, appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, other
legislative committees as necessary, the Governor and the Chief Court
Administrator, and (4) building organizational member capacity,
leadership and advocacy across the geographic and social spectrum of
the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer community.
(c) The network membership shall reflect the diversity of the lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender and queer community and include, but need
not be limited to, the following members, or their designees, appointed
jointly by the speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
Public Act No. 26-72 3 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
pro tempore of the Senate:
(1) [The president of Connecticut Latinas/os Achieving Rights and
Opportunities (CLARO)] A health care provider, licensed pursuant to
chapter 370 or 378, serving the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and
queer community;
(2) [The executive director of the Safe Harbor Project] A mental health
provider, licensed pursuant to chapter 370 or 383, serving the lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender and queer community;
(3) [The executive director of the New Haven Pride Center] A
representative of an organization that works to improve the health of
people living with HIV/AIDS;
(4) [The executive director of the Triangle Community Center in
Norwalk] An attorney representative of an organization that works to
eliminate LGBTQ+ discrimination, who is admitted to practice pursuant
to chapter 876;
(5) [The executive director of Advancing CT Together] A
representative of an organization that works with lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender and queer youth;
(6) [The executive director of the Connecticut chapter of the Gay,
Lesbian & Straight Education Network (GLSEN)] A representative of an
organization that works with lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and
queer elderly persons;
(7) [The executive director of the Rainbow Center at The University
of Connecticut] A veteran who is lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or
queer;
(8) [The executive director of the Hartford Gay and Lesbian Health
Collective] A representative from a lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender
Public Act No. 26-72 4 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
and queer corporate employee affinity group;
(9) [The executive director of the Connecticut Transadvocacy
Coalition] An educator who is lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or
queer;
(10) [The president of OutCT in New London] A representative of an
organization that works with a resettlement community providing
support for refugees and other immigrants;
(11) [The executive director of the Queer Unity Empowerment
Support Team] An executive director of a lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender or queer community center;
(12) [The executive director of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity] A representative of an organization
that works with the disability community;
(13) [A lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or queer physician,
licensed pursuant to chapter 370, appointed by the speaker of the House
of Representatives] A representative of an affirming interfaith
organization that works to welcome and include diverse communities,
including, but not limited to, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and
queer persons;
(14) [A member of the LGBT Aging Advocacy coalition, appointed by
the Governor] A parent or caregiver of a lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender or queer child;
(15) [The president of Connecticut Community Care;] The executive
director of the Commission on Women, Children, Seniors, Equity and
Opportunity; and
[(16) The executive director of A Place to Nourish Your Health;
(17) The executive director of Kamora's Cultural Corner;
Public Act No. 26-72 5 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
(18) A lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or queer provider of mental
health services, licensed pursuant to chapter 370 or 383;
(19) The executive director of Apex Community Care; and
(20) The executive director of Queer Youth Program of Connecticut.]
(16) Not more than nine at-large representatives with an interest in
furthering state policy specific to the interests and welfare of lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender and queer persons.
(d) Members shall serve at the will of the speaker of the House of
Representatives and the president pro tempore of the Senate, who may
each appoint additional members pursuant to subdivision (16) of
subsection (c) of this section and set term limits for each member.
Appointments to the network shall be made not later than [sixty days
after July 1, 2019] September 1, 2026. Members shall choose
chairpersons. Any vacancy shall be filled by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, acting in consultation with the president pro tempore
of the Senate.
(e) The administrative staff of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity shall, within available appropriations,
provide administrative support to the network.
(f) Members shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of the network's
business and shall annually elect from among the members officers as
may be designated in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for (1)
alternate representatives of the network to attend and vote at any
meeting in place of absent representatives, (2) an executive committee
of the network and for additional committees, including, but not limited
to, nonvoting advisory committees, (3) procedures to address
nonattendance by members, including, but not limited to, standards for
participation, notice requirements and potential consequences for
repeated or unexcused absences, and (4) procedures for adopting a
Public Act No. 26-72 6 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
governance model.
Sec. 5. Section 17b-337 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There shall be established a Long-Term Care Planning Committee
for the purpose of exchanging information on long-term care issues,
coordinating policy development and establishing a long-term care plan
for all persons in need of long-term care. Such policy and plan shall
provide that individuals with long-term care needs have the option to
choose and receive long-term care and support in the least restrictive,
appropriate setting. Such plan shall integrate the three components of a
long-term care system including home and community-based services,
supportive housing arrangements and nursing facilities. Such plan shall
include: (1) A vision and mission statement for a long-term care system;
(2) the current number of persons receiving services; (3) the current
number of persons receiving long-term care supports and services in the
community and the number receiving such supports and services in
institutions; (4) demographic data concerning such persons by service
type; (5) the current aggregate cost of such system of services; (6)
forecasts of future demand for services; (7) the type of services available
and the amount of funds necessary to meet the demand; (8) projected
costs for programs associated with such system; (9) strategies to
promote the partnership for long-term care program; (10) resources
necessary to accomplish goals for the future; (11) funding sources
available; and (12) the number and types of providers needed to deliver
services. The plan shall address how changes in one component of such
long-term care system impact other components of such system.
(b) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall, within available
appropriations, study issues relative to long-term care, including, but
not limited to: [, the] (1) State models for financing of long-term care,
including, but not limited to, payroll deductions for long-term care; (2)
best practices for workforce retention, workforce wages and workforce
Public Act No. 26-72 7 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
standards; (3) projected federal support for long-term care and solutions
for insufficient federal funding; (4) the case-mix system of Medicaid
reimbursement; [,] (5) community-based service options; [,] (6) access to
long-term care and geriatric psychiatric services; [. The committee shall
evaluate issues relative to] (7) long-term care in light of the United States
Supreme Court decision, Olmstead v. L.C., 119 S. Ct. 2176 (1999),
requiring states to place persons with disabilities in community settings
rather than in institutions when such placement is appropriate, the
transfer to a less restrictive setting is not opposed by such persons and
such placement can be reasonably accommodated; [. The committee,
within available appropriations, shall evaluate] and (8) available data
on the average net actual Medicaid expenditures for nursing homes, in
comparison to average net actual Medicaid expenditures for home and
community-based services waiver participants who require a nursing
home level of care. [, including the number of individuals served, to
assist in short-term and long-term Medicaid expenditure forecasting.]
(c) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall consist of: (1) The
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services, public health [, elderly services and long-term care] and aging;
(2) the Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's designee;
(3) [one member of the Office of Policy and Management appointed by]
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
designee, who shall serve as a chairperson; (4) [one member from the
Department of Public Health appointed by] the Commissioner of Public
Health, or the commissioner's designee; (5) [one member from the
Department of Housing appointed by] the Commissioner of Housing,
or the commissioner's designee; (6) [one member from the Department
of Developmental Services appointed by] the Commissioner of
Developmental Services, or the commissioner's designee; (7) [one
member from the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
appointed by] the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction
Public Act No. 26-72 8 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
Services, or the commissioner's designee; (8) [one member from the
Department of Transportation appointed by] the Commissioner of
Transportation, or the commissioner's designee; (9) [one member from
the Department of Children and Families appointed by] the
Commissioner of Children and Families, or the commissioner's
designee; (10) [one member from] a representative of the Health
Systems Planning Unit of the Office of Health Strategy appointed by the
Commissioner of Health Strategy; and (11) [one member from the
Department of Aging and Disability Services appointed by] the
Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, [. The committee shall
convene no later than ninety days after June 4, 1998] or the
commissioner's designee. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority. [The chairperson shall be elected from among the members
of the committee] Members shall elect a Senate chairperson and a House
chairperson from among the members appointed pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection, who shall serve as chairpersons of the
committee along with the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, or the secretary's designee. The committee shall seek the
advice and participation of any person, organization or state or federal
agency it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(d) Not later than January [1, 2018, and annually thereafter] first
annually, the Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall submit a
report and recommendations to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging and
human services on the [number of persons receiving (1)] issues the
committee studies pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The report
shall include a listing of long-term care supports and services in the
community [;] and [(2)] long-term care supports and services in
institutions.
(e) Not later than January 1, 1999, and every three years thereafter,
the Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall submit a long-term care
Public Act No. 26-72 9 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
plan pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to human services, public health [, elderly services and long-
term care] and aging, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a,
and such plan shall serve as a guide for the actions of state agencies in
developing and modifying programs that serve persons in need of long-
term care.
(f) Any state agency, when developing or modifying any program
that, in whole or in part, provides assistance or support to persons with
long-term care needs, shall, to the maximum extent feasible, include
provisions that support care-giving provided by family members and
other informal caregivers and promote consumer-directed care.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2028, the committee shall, within
available appropriations, issue a report on the impact of Public Law 119-
21 and other recent federal regulatory changes on the financing of long-
term care options in the state and solicit recommendations for further
action.
Sec. 6. Section 17b-338 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established a Long-Term Care Advisory Council which
shall consist of the following: (1) The executive director of the
Commission on Women, Children, Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, or
the executive director's designee; (2) the State Nursing Home
Ombudsman, or the ombudsman's designee; (3) the president of the
Coalition of Presidents of Resident Councils, or the president's designee;
(4) [the executive director of the Legal Assistance Resource Center of
Connecticut, or the executive director's designee] a representative from
one of the following state legal services programs: CT Legal Services,
Greater Hartford Legal Aid or New Haven Legal Assistance
Association; (5) the state president of AARP, or the president's designee;
Public Act No. 26-72 10 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
(6) one representative of a bargaining unit for health care employees,
appointed by the president of the bargaining unit; (7) the president of
LeadingAge Connecticut & Rhode Island, Inc., or the president's
designee; (8) the president of the Connecticut Association of Health Care
Facilities, or the president's designee; (9) the president of the
Connecticut Association of Residential Care Homes, or the president's
designee; (10) the president of the Connecticut Hospital Association or
the president's designee; (11) the executive director of the Connecticut
Assisted Living Association or the executive director's designee; (12) the
executive director of the Connecticut Association for Homecare or the
executive director's designee; (13) the president of Connecticut
Community Care, Inc. or the president's designee; (14) one member of
the Connecticut Association of Area Agencies on Aging appointed by
the agency; (15) the president of the Connecticut chapter of the
Connecticut Alzheimer's Association; (16) one member of the
Connecticut Association of Adult Day Centers appointed by the
association; (17) the president of the Connecticut Chapter of the
American College of Health Care Administrators, or the president's
designee; (18) the president of the Connecticut Council for Persons with
Disabilities, or the president's designee; (19) the president of the
Connecticut Association of Community Action Agencies, or the
president's designee; (20) a personal care attendant appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives; (21) a person who, in a home
setting, cares for a person with a disability and is appointed by the
president pro tempore of the Senate; (22) three persons with a disability
appointed one each by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, the majority leader of the Senate and the minority
leader of the House of Representatives; (23) a legislator who is a member
of the Long-Term Care Planning Committee; (24) one member who is a
nonunion home health aide appointed by the minority leader of the
Senate; [and] (25) the executive director of the nonprofit entity
designated by the Governor in accordance with section 46a-10b to serve
as the Connecticut protection and advocacy system or the executive
Public Act No. 26-72 11 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
director's designee; (26) the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, or the secretary's designee; and (27) the House and Senate
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services, or their designees.
(b) The House chairperson and Senate chairperson of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to human services shall jointly appoint the chairpersons
of the council. The council shall advise and make recommendations to
the Long-Term Care Planning Committee established under section 17b-
337, as amended by this act, concerning the study conducted by the
committee pursuant to subsection (b) of section 17b-337, as amended by
this act, and may accept gifts or other charitable contributions to the
state to help finance its work.
(c) The Long-Term Care Advisory Council shall seek
recommendations from persons with disabilities or persons receiving
long-term care services who reflect the socio-economic diversity of the
state.
Sec. 7. Subsection (d) of section 19a-127l of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) The advisory committee shall consist of (1) four members who
represent and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Hospital
Association, including three members who represent three separate
hospitals that are not affiliated of which one such hospital is an
academic medical center; (2) one member who represents and shall be
appointed by the Connecticut Nursing Association; (3) two members
who represent and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Medical
Society, including one member who is an active medical care provider;
(4) two members who represent and shall be appointed by the
Public Act No. 26-72 12 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
Connecticut Business and Industry Association, including one member
who represents a large business and one member who represents a
small business; (5) one member who represents and shall be appointed
by the Home Health Care Association; (6) one member who represents
and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Association of Health Care
Facilities; (7) one member who represents and shall be appointed by
LeadingAge Connecticut & Rhode Island, Inc.; (8) two members who
represent and shall be appointed by the AFL-CIO; (9) one member who
represents consumers of health care services and who shall be
appointed by the Commissioner of Public Health; (10) one member who
represents a school of public health and who shall be appointed by the
Commissioner of Public Health; (11) the Commissioner of Public Health
or said commissioner's designee; (12) the Commissioner of Social
Services or said commissioner's designee; (13) the Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management or said secretary's designee; (14) two
members who represent licensed health plans and shall be appointed by
the Connecticut Association of Health Care Plans; (15) one member who
represents and shall be appointed by the federally designated state peer
review organization; and (16) one member who represents and shall be
appointed by the Connecticut Pharmaceutical Association. The
chairperson of the advisory committee shall be the Commissioner of
Public Health or said commissioner's designee. The chairperson of the
committee, with a vote of the majority of the members present, may
appoint ex-officio nonvoting members in specialties not represented
among voting members. Vacancies shall be filled by the person who
makes the appointment under this subsection.
Sec. 8. Subsection (b) of section 19a-515 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) Each licensee shall complete a minimum of forty hours of
continuing education every two years, including, but not limited to,
Public Act No. 26-72 13 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
training in (1) Alzheimer's disease and dementia symptoms and care,
and (2) infection prevention and control. Such two-year period shall
commence on the first date of renewal of the licensee's license after
January 1, 2004. The continuing education shall be in areas related to the
licensee's practice. Qualifying continuing education activities are
courses offered or approved by the Connecticut Association of
Healthcare Facilities, LeadingAge Connecticut & Rhode Island, Inc., the
Connecticut Assisted Living Association, the Connecticut Alliance for
Subacute Care, Inc., the Connecticut Chapter of the American College of
Health Care Administrators, the Association For Long Term Care
Financial Managers, the Alzheimer's Association or any accredited
college or university, or programs presented or approved by the
National Continuing Education Review Service of the National
Association of Boards of Examiners of Long Term Care Administrators,
the Association for Professionals in Infection Control and Epidemiology
or by federal or state departments or agencies.
Sec. 9. Subsection (b) of section 309 of public act 23-204 is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) The Department of Social Services or its agent shall consult with
health care providers with expertise regarding gender-affirming care in
developing and updating coverage policy for gender-affirming care in
the HUSKY Health program. [The Commissioner of Social Services shall
provide a report not less than annually regarding coverage of gender-
affirming care in the HUSKY Health program to the Council on Medical
Assistance Program Oversight established pursuant to section 17b-28 of
the general statutes for review and comment.]
Sec. 10. (Effective July 1, 2026) The provisions of 42 CFR 483.45(e) with
respect to the provision of anti-psychotic pharmaceuticals to a resident
of a nursing home and 42 CFR 483.10(c) with respect to informed
consent to treatment by a resident of a nursing home, adopted as of
January 1, 2026, shall apply to the provisions of the general statutes in
Public Act No. 26-72 14 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
the same manner and with the same force and effect as if the language
of the federal regulations had been incorporated in full into the general
statutes.
Sec. 11. Subsection (d) of section 17a-812 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services may expend
up to [ten] fourteen thousand dollars per fiscal year per person twenty-
one years of age or older who is both blind or visually impaired and
deaf, in addition to any other expenditures for such person, for the
purpose of providing community inclusion services through specialized
public and private entities from which such person can benefit. The
commissioner may determine the criteria by which a person is eligible
to receive specialized services and may adopt regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "community inclusion services" means the assistance
provided to persons with disabilities to enable them to connect with
their peers without disabilities and with the community at large.
Sec. 12. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than October 1, 2027,
and annually thereafter until October 1, 2032, the Commissioner of
Social Services shall file a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and human services on
(1) the number of persons eligible for the HUSKY C health program, as
defined in section 17b-290 of the general statutes, for the prior fiscal
year, (2) the number of persons found ineligible for the program for
exceeding the asset limit and the amount by which their assets exceeded
the limit, and (3) projected costs to be incurred by the state in the
succeeding fiscal year if the asset limits were increased.
Public Act No. 26-72 15 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
Sec. 13. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, (1) "peer
support services" means recovery-focused behavioral health services
that allow an individual the opportunity to learn to manage such
individual's recovery with help from a peer support specialist; and (2)
"peer support specialist" means an individual who (A) has experience
living with mental illness or substance use disorder, and (B) is certified
to provide peer recovery support under a program administered by the
Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall evaluate how peer
support specialists are reimbursed, supervised and trained and make
recommendations on how to structure a reimbursement system to better
integrate their work into the state medical assistance program. The
commissioner shall review:
(1) Services under the medical assistance program that would benefit
from peer support services and peer support specialists;
(2) How such services and specialists are used in the medical
assistance program;
(3) Payment mechanisms currently used to reimburse such
specialists;
(4) How such specialists are trained and supervised in the medical
assistance program;
(5) Best practices in other states for reimbursement, training and
supervision of such specialists and integration of their services into
medical assistance programs; and
(6) Alternate payment mechanisms to ensure a sufficient number of
such specialists are available to serve the needs of medical assistance
beneficiaries.
Public Act No. 26-72 16 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
(c) Not later than January 31, 2027, the commissioner shall file a
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, with the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to human services, on the
evaluation and recommendations.
Sec. 14. Section 42-339 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established a complex rehabilitation technology and
wheelchair repair advisory council to monitor repairs of wheelchairs,
including complex rehabilitation technology wheelchairs, as defined in
section 42-337, and to make recommendations concerning improving
repair times.
(b) The advisory council shall consist of the following members:
(1) [Two] Three appointed by the House and Senate chairpersons of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services, [one of whom is a
consumer who uses] two of whom are consumers who use a complex
rehabilitation technology wheelchair purchased, leased or repaired
under the Medicaid program, and one of whom is a representative of
the state advocacy system for persons with disabilities, established
pursuant to section 46a-10b;
(2) Two appointed by the House and Senate ranking members of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to human services, one of whom is a consumer who
uses a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair purchased, leased
or repaired under a private health insurance policy, and one of whom is
an authorized wheelchair dealer, as defined in section 42-337;
(3) Two appointed by the House and Senate chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
Public Act No. 26-72 17 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
matters relating to general law, each of whom is a representative of an
organization that represents persons with physical disabilities;
(4) Two appointed by the House and Senate ranking members of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to general law, [each] one of whom is a consumer who
privately pays for complex rehabilitation technology wheelchairs and
one of whom is an authorized wheelchair dealer, as defined in section
42-337;
(5) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(6) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(7) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(8) The Healthcare Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee;
and
(9) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the commissioner's
designee.
(c) Any member of the advisory council appointed under subdivision
(1), (2), (3) or (4) of subsection (b) of this section [may be a member of
the General Assembly] shall serve two-year terms at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
(d) All initial appointments to the advisory council shall be made not
later than August 1, 2024. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The advisory council shall meet at least monthly.
(e) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee, and a member of the advisory council chosen
by a majority of members of the advisory council, shall serve as
Public Act No. 26-72 18 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
chairpersons. Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the
advisory council not later than September 1, 2024.
(f) The administrative staff of the [joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services] Office of the Healthcare Advocate shall serve as administrative
staff of the advisory council.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the
advisory council shall submit a report on its findings and
recommendations to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging, general law,
human services and insurance, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a.
Sec. 15. Section 42-338 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall timely repair a wheelchair,
including a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair, sold or
leased by such dealer in the state. An authorized wheelchair dealer who
sells or leases a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair in the
state shall provide timely repair of such wheelchair at a consumer's
home upon request.
(b) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall maintain an electronic mail
address and a phone line for consumer repair requests that are
accessible each business day and capable of receiving and recording
messages. The authorized wheelchair dealer shall (1) respond to a
request for wheelchair repair not later than one business day after the
date of request, and (2) order parts for a repair not later than three
business days after assessing the need for the repair or after receiving
prior authorization from an insurer for the repair.
(c) On and after July 1, 2024, the Office of the Healthcare Advocate,
Public Act No. 26-72 19 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
in consultation with the Department of Consumer Protection, shall
maintain a phone number and electronic mail address to be posted
conspicuously on the Internet web sites of the Office of the Healthcare
Advocate and the department, to receive and record complaints
regarding timely repair issues. Not later than January 1, 2025, and
annually thereafter, the Healthcare Advocate shall submit a report to the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to general law, human services and insurance
regarding the complaints received and recorded pursuant to this
subsection.
(d) Not later than December 31, 2024, and [annually] monthly
thereafter, an authorized wheelchair dealer that contracts with the
Department of Social Services to sell or lease wheelchairs to Medicaid
recipients shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Social Services
and the advisory council established pursuant to section 42-339, as
amended by this act, regarding repair of such wheelchairs. The report
shall include, but need not be limited to, minimum, maximum and
average times from the date and time of a repair request for the
authorized wheelchair dealer to (1) respond; (2) conduct a repair
assessment (A) in the home or other community location, (B) remotely,
or (C) at a repair facility; (3) request any necessary prior authorization
from the Department of Social Services and receive a decision from the
department on such request; (4) order any wheelchair parts needed; (5)
receive delivery of any needed repair parts; and (6) complete repairs (A)
in the home or other community location, (B) remotely, or (C) at a repair
facility.
(e) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall notify a consumer of such
consumer's rights to timely repair, including a repair at the consumer's
home upon the consumer's request, and other rights pursuant to this
section in writing at the time of purchase or lease by the consumer of a
wheelchair from the authorized wheelchair dealer and on such dealer's
Public Act No. 26-72 20 of 21

Substitute House Bill No. 5562
Internet web site and any mailings to the consumer.
Sec. 16. (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of Social Services
shall, in collaboration with the Commissioners of Children and Families,
Developmental Services and Mental Health and Addiction Services, and
the Office of the Behavioral Health Advocate, study the feasibility of
establishing an inpatient facility to provide psychiatric treatment
services to children and young adults between the ages of fourteen and
twenty-one, inclusive, who have intellectual or developmental
disabilities.
(b) The study shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) The
appropriate size of such facility and number of persons to be served at
one time; (2) the best treatment practices for the population; (3) the
operational costs of establishing such a facility and the feasibility of
operating the facility within available agency appropriations; (4)
appropriate sites, which may include state-owned property, on which
the facility may be built; and (5) billing options for payment of inpatient
psychiatric services for the population served, including Medicaid
billing options.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall file a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
the general statutes, on the results of the study with the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to children, human services, public health and appropriations
and the budgets of state agencies.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-72 21 of 21